bg_IV3.aff
FLAG long					
#  -инъ 
SFX G9 Y 7
SFX G9  ъ         а        инъ      is:singular    Р, В, Т
SFX G9  ъ         о        инъ      is:singular   И,З
SFX G9  ъ         у        инъ      is:singular  Д
SFX G9  инъ       и/C2     инъ      is:plural  В,Т
SFX G9  инъ       ы        инъ      is:plural  В,Т
SFX G9  инъ       ье/C2    инъ      is:plural 
SFX G9  инъ       іе       инъ      is:plural 


# 2-ро склонение -а основи, ж.р и м.р 
#  ж р -а   жена -- мр. -а воевода
# -ина, -[рдлвн]ота, -[мбпф]ета, -[ь]да, -тва, -оба, -[рдлвн]ова, -[мбпф]ева, -ьба
SFX Z0 Y 5    
SFX Z0   а           ѣ         а      is:singular  Д  
SFX Z0   а           ѫ/C3      а      is:singular  В 
SFX Z0   а           о         а      is:singular  З
SFX Z0   а           и/C2      а      is:plural  И
SFX Z0   а           ы/C2      а      is:plural  Д, В, Т

# душа
SFX Z1 Y 7    
SFX Z1   а           ѣ          [ш]а      is:singular  Д  
SFX Z1   ка         цѣ          [к]а      is:singular  Д  
SFX Z1   а           іѫ/C3      [ш]а      is:singular  В 
SFX Z1   а           ѫ/C3       [к]а      is:singular  В 
SFX Z1   а           о           а        is:singular  З
SFX Z1   а           и/C2        а        is:plural  И
SFX Z1   а           ы/C2       [ш]а      is:plural  Д, В, Т


#радость, богиня
SFX Z2 Y 7  
SFX Z2   ь           е         ь      is:singular  З
SFX Z2   ь           и/C2      ь      is:plural  Д    
SFX Z2   ь           ь/C3      ь      is:singular  Д  
SFX Z2   я           о         я      is:singular  З
SFX Z2   я           іѫ        я      is:singular  В
SFX Z2   я           и/C2      я      is:plural  Д    
SFX Z2   я           я/C3      я      is:singular  Д  

# ср. род
SFX S0   Y 3
SFX S0   о        а/C3     о          is:plural  
SFX S0   е        а/C3     [^іирлт]е  is:plural  
SFX S0   е        я/C3     [іирлт]е   is:plural  

# ср. род
SFX S1   Y 2
SFX S1   о        eса/C3   о       is:plural  
SFX S1   е        eса/C3   е       is:plural  

# ср. род
SFX S2   Y 2
SFX S2   е        eна/C3   е       is:plural  
SFX S2   о        eна/C3   о       is:plural  

SFX P1   Y 10
SFX P1   ъ        ий/C1    ъ       is:singular is:m 
SFX P1   ъ        ый/C1    ъ       is:singular is:m 
SFX P1   ъ        ому      ъ       is:singular is:m 
SFX P1   ъ        аго      ъ       is:singular is:m
SFX P1   ъ        ия       ъ       is:singular is:m
SFX P1   ъ        а        ъ       is:singular is:f
SFX P1   ъ        ѫ        ъ       is:singular is:f
SFX P1   ъ        о/C1        ъ       is:singular is:n
SFX P1   ъ        и/C2     ъ       is:plural
SFX P1   ъ        ы/C2     ъ       is:plural


SFX P3   Y 6
SFX P3   и        ий/C1    и       is:singular is:m 
SFX P3   и        ый/C1    и       is:singular is:m 
SFX P3   и        ому      и       is:singular is:m 
SFX P3   и        аго       и       is:singular is:m
SFX P3   и        ия        и       is:singular is:m
SFX P3   и        о/C1     и       is:singular is:n

SFX P2   Y 9
SFX P2   ь        ий/C1    ь       is:singular is:m 
SFX P2   ь        ій/C1    ь       is:singular is:m 
SFX P2   ь        ему      ь       is:singular is:m 
SFX P2   ь        его      ь       is:singular is:m
SFX P2   ь        ія       ь       is:singular is:m
SFX P2   ь        я        ь       is:singular is:f
SFX P2   ь        іѫ       ь       is:singular is:f
SFX P2   ь        ьо/C1       ь       is:singular is:n
SFX P2   ь        и/C2     ь       is:plural
