bg_IV3.dic
богиня/Z2	po:noun
врѣме/S2	po:noun
дърво/S1	po:noun
лѣто/S0	po:noun
майка/Z1	po:noun
море/S0	po:noun
небе/S1	po:noun
поле/S0	po:noun
радость/Z2	po:noun
рамо/S2	po:noun
село/S0	po:noun
училище/S0	po:noun
чудо/S1	po:noun
старъ/P1	po:adj
богатъ/P1	po:adj
синь/P2	po:adj
абатски/P3	po:adj
